Oklahoma, session 2026, HB4139.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 7600 of Title 36, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. This act shall be known and may be cited as the "Oklahoma
Home Service Act".
B. Home warranty companies shall make visible in their
principal place of business and official company website, if
applicable, by posting in an inconspicuous location the following:
1. All applicable fees; and
2. Detailed pricing for covered modifications, including labor
and parts.
C. Any employed or contracted repair personnel of a home
warranty company shall:
ENGR. H. B. NO. 4139 Page 1

1. Be bonded and insured;
2. Hold a valid state license; or
3. Present documented proof of required training or
certifications.
D. Any employed or contracted repair personnl of a home
warranty company performing work regulated by Oklahoma professional
and occupational licensing and registration laws shall comply with
all Oklahoma state licensing and registration laws, including
holding a current license or registration in good standing.
E. Home warranty companies shall provide all specific licenses,
training standards, or certifications required of hired contractors
and employees to the policyholder within twenty-four (24) hours upon
request.
F. Home warranty companies shall arrange the appropriate
representative to assess any covered warranty item no later than
forty-eight (48) hours after a claim is submitted.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.







ENGR. H. B. NO. 4139 Page 2

Passed the House of Representatives the 24th day of March, 2026.


Presiding Officer of the House
of Representatives

Passed the Senate the ___ day of __________, 2026.


Presiding Officer of the Senate
















ENGR. H. B. NO. 4139 Page 3